Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5606.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 20-13 of the General Laws entitled "Hunting and Hunting Safety" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
20-13-19. Wildlife killing contest prohibited.
(a) As used in this section, "wildlife killing contest", also referred to as predator hunting
contests, challenges, drives, tournaments, or derbies, means a contest, organized competition,
tournament, or derby that has as its objective the taking or hunting of any furbearers, as defined by
§ 20-16-1, on state or private land, for cash, prizes, or other inducement.
(b) A person, organization, or business shall not organize, sponsor, promote, conduct, or
participate in any wildlife killing contest in this state.
(c) The prohibition in subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Field trials permitted by the department under §§ 20-19-1 through 20-19-4;
(2) Wildlife damage control activities authorized under § 20-1-24, as long as those
activities do not take place during a contest, organized competition, tournament, or derby; and
(3) Lawful hunting or trapping activities authorized under §§ 20-1-4; 20-1-8; 20-1-12; and
20-1-13, as long as those activities do not take place during a contest, organized competition, or
derby.
(d) A person who violates this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than five hundred
dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a first offense. Upon a second

and all subsequent convictions related to violations of subsection (b) of this section, or any
conviction while their hunting license is suspended, a person who violates this section shall be fined
a minimum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(e) An organization or business which violates this section shall be fined not less than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a first offense. Upon
a second and all subsequent convictions related to violations of subsection (b) of this section an
organization or business which violates this section shall be fined not less than five thousand dollars
($5,000) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000983
========
LC000983 - Page 2 of 3